Utah statutes.
11-25-21.   Act deemed supplemental to other laws -- Compliance in issuing bonds sufficient.

This act shall be deemed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for doing the things authorized thereby, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to the powers conferred upon an agency by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under the provisions of this part need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

